District of Columbia statutes.
8-1908

Rules.

The Mayor shall, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

Oct. 18, 1988, D.C. Law 7-176, § 10, 35 DCR 4787
1981 Ed., § 6-1021.8.